Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.490

Obstruction of director or sealer in performance of duties—Penalty.

Any person who hinders or obstructs in any way the director or a city sealer in the performance of official duties under this chapter is subject to a civil penalty up to five thousand dollars.

[ 2019 c 96 s 15; 1992 c 237 s 32; 1969 c 67 s 49.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2019 c 96: See note following RCW 19.94.160.